Hawaii, session 2025, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-301, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The examiner of drivers, upon receipt of the application by any individual who is a resident or a temporary resident of this State, shall issue an identification card, free of charge, to that individual [upon receipt of any appropriate fee established pursuant to section 286-309]." SECTION 2.  Section 286-301.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Every application under this section shall be free of charge and made upon the form and in the manner required by section 286-303 [and shall be accompanied by the fee established for compliant identification cards pursuant to section 286-309]." SECTION 3.  Section 286-301.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Every application under this section shall be free of charge and made upon the form, and in the manner, required by section 286-303 [and be accompanied by the fee established for non-limited purpose identification cards pursuant to section 286-30].  The examiner of drivers shall not: (1)  Require any applicant under this section to furnish information regarding the applicant's eligibility or ineligibility for a social security number; or (2)  Disclose the identity of any applicant who does not provide a social security card or social security number." SECTION 4.  Section 286-303, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Application for renewal of an identification card issued after November 1, 1998, for an individual eighty years of age or older may be done by mailing in or electronically submitting a completed application [and fee], if there is no change in name and citizenship status.  The director shall adopt rules to allow for renewal by mail or electronic methods for individuals with physical or intellectual disabilities for whom application in person presents a serious burden.  For an individual who has a letter from a licensed primary care provider certifying that a severe disability causes the individual to be homebound, the director shall adopt rules allowing for application for renewal of an identification card under this section by means other than in-person appearance.  A non-compliant identification card shall be issued in accordance with section 286-301.5 for renewal applications not made in person." SECTION 5.  Section 286-306, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  Every identification card issued under this part, whether an original or a renewal, shall bear an expiration date that shall be the date and month of the individual's birthday eight years after the year of issuance; provided that if the individual is a legal nonimmigrant, the certificate shall bear an expiration date that is the same as the expiration date on the individual's arrival-departure record, CBP Form I-94.  A cardholder may renew the cardholder's identification card, free of charge, within six months before the day on which it expires by filing an application in accordance with section 286-303 [and paying the prescribed fee [established] by rules of the director]. (b) If an identification card is lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated, the individual to whom the identification card was issued may obtain a duplicate, free of charge, by [paying the fee established by rules of the director and by]: (1)  Furnishing suitable proof of the loss, destruction, or mutilation to the examiner; and (2)  Filing an application and presenting documentary evidence under section 286-303. Any individual who loses an identification card and, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original, shall immediately surrender the original to the examiner." SECTION 6.  Section 286-308, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  A cardholder who, after receiving an identification card, has a change in one or more of the following: (1)  Name, legally changed by marriage, divorce, adoption, legitimization, order of the lieutenant governor, or other legal means; (2)  Citizenship status; (3)  Address; or (4)  Individual in charge of the cardholder (in the case of a minor or incompetent individual), within thirty days after the change, shall report the change, submit supporting documents, and present the cardholder's identification card to the examiner.  The examiner of drivers, upon being furnished with satisfactory proof as to the change, [and receiving payment of the fee,] shall cancel the identification card and issue a new identification card, free of charge, bearing the new name, citizenship status, or address of the cardholder, making appropriate notation of the facts upon the records of the examiner." SECTION 7.  Section 286-309, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§286-309  Rules. For the purpose of carrying out this part, the director, pursuant to chapter 91, shall adopt rules [including rules assessing reasonable fees] for the services provided under this part. The rules shall[: (1)  Authorize] authorize the examiner of drivers to waive any fee in cases of extreme hardship and provide criteria for determining whether a waiver is warranted[; and (2)  Direct the examiner of drivers to waive all fees for the issuance of an original or renewal identification card for any individual who is homeless; provided the individual's homeless status is corroborated by a verification letter issued by a homeless service provider.], except that no fee may be charged in connection with the issuance or renewal of any civil identification card under this chapter." SECTION 8.  Section 286-312, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["[§286-312]  Civil identification card fee special fund.  There is established in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the civil identification card fee special fund.  The fund shall consist of all fees assessed for the processing and issuance of identification cards.  The fund shall be used for the purposes of the identification card program.  The fund shall be administered by the director. The fund shall be held separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts in the state treasury. Interest and investment earnings credited to the assets of the fund shall become a part of the fund.  Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried over to the next fiscal year."] SECTION 9.  Any unexpended and unencumbered balance of the civil identification card fee special fund shall lapse to the general fund. SECTION 10.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 11.  This Act shall take effect on June 30, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________